Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 3. Procedure to Obtain a License.

Collateral references. —

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Marriage, §§ 31-37.

55 C.J.S., Marriage, §§ 27-29.

Sec. 25.05.091.
Application for license; disclosure for child support purposes.

One of the contracting parties to a prospective marriage shall, at least three days before the time of issuance, file with the licensing officer written, verbal, or telegraphic application for a license. Before issuance of the license, each contracting party shall make a statement under oath that the contemplated marriage meets the requirements of law, giving the names, relationship if any, residence, occupation, and age of each party; naming guardians of any party under the legal age for marriage; and describing any prior marriage of either party, and the manner of dissolution of it. This statement may be made and executed before a notary public or postmaster who shall certify it to the licensing officer.

In addition to the requirements of (a) of this section, each contracting party to the prospective marriage shall provide to the licensing officer the party’s social security number, if any. Upon request, the licensing officer shall provide a social security number provided under this subsection to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 134 SLA 1984; am § 35 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in
AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in
AS

25.27.010

” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a),
ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 25.05.100.
Use of laboratory reports. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Secs. 25.05.101, 25.05.105.
Premarital certificate; prescribed tests. [Repealed, § 4 ch 134 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 25.05.110.
Penalty for violation. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.111.
Issuance of license.

A marriage license may not be issued unless both of the contracting parties are identified to the satisfaction of the licensing officer. If all requirements have been met, and there is no legal objection to the contemplated marriage, and neither party is under the influence of intoxicating liquor or otherwise incapable of understanding the seriousness of the proceeding, the licensing officer shall issue a license.

With a license issued under (a) of this section, the licensing officer shall also give to the parties written information about fetal alcohol effects and the fetal health effects of chemical abuse and battering during pregnancy. The Department of Health and Social Services shall prepare or obtain this information and submit it in distributable form to each licensing officer in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 144 SLA 1990)

Sec. 25.05.120.
Premarital certificate noted on license. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.121.
Marriage license.

The marriage license issued by a licensing officer in this state authorizes the marriage ceremony to be performed anywhere in the state.
The license shall be directed “to any person authorized by the laws of this state to solemnize marriage,” and shall authorize that person to solemnize marriage between the parties identified by the license within three months of the date of the license.
If either party is not of legal age for marriage, that party’s age and the fact of the consent of the parents or guardian of the underaged party shall be stated.
If either party has previously been married, the number of previous marriages shall be stated. The registrar may require other matter necessary to identify the parties to be included in the license.
The issuance of a license does not remove or dispense with any legal disability, impediment, or prohibition rendering marriage between the parties illegal, and a statement to that effect shall be included in the license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.130.
Waiver of examination and laboratory test. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.131.
Laboratory reports of infectious or heritable diseases. [Repealed, § 4 ch 134 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 25.05.140.
Failure to comply is misdemeanor. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.141.
Laboratory results confidential. [Repealed, § 4 ch 134 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 25.05.150.
License required. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.151.
Tests and laboratories. [Repealed, § 4 ch 134 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 25.05.160.
License to parties under age of consent. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.161.
Waiver of waiting period.

If a three-day waiting period would result in undue hardship or delay in an individual case, the licensing officer may waive the three-day requirement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.170.
Penalty for unlawful issuance. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.171.
Persons capable of consenting to marriage: Minimum ages, and consent of parents or guardian.

A person who has reached the age of 16 but is under the age of 18 shall be issued a marriage license if the written consent of the parents, the parent having actual care, custody, and control, or a guardian of the underaged person is filed with the licensing officer issuing the marriage license under AS

25.05.111

.

A superior court judge may grant permission for a person who has reached the age of 14 but is under the age of 18 to marry and may order the licensing officer to issue the license if the judge finds, following a hearing at which the parents and minor are given the opportunity to appear and be heard, that the marriage is in the best interest of the minor and that either

the parents have given their consent; or

the parents are

arbitrarily and capriciously withholding consent;

absent or otherwise unaccountable;

in disagreement among themselves on the question; or

unfit to decide the matter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 93 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 1975)

Sec. 25.05.180.
Blank forms to be prescribed and furnished. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.181.
Waiver order. [Repealed, § 4 ch 134 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 25.05.190.
Contents of license and effect of issuance. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]